Massachusetts, session 194th, S1809.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 12 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws is amended by inserting at the end of line
146 the following sentence:- In the event that any of the aforementioned eligible beneficiaries is
the beneficiary of a special needs trust, the trustee or fiduciary of said trust shall be eligible for
nomination as beneficiary under this option.
of 1